District of Columbia statutes.
31-2502.41

License fees.

(a)

Annual fees to be paid through the Commissioner to the District of Columbia for licenses issued under this chapter shall include a $250 annual renewal fee for registration and certification for Risk Retention and Purchasing Groups and any other fee established pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

Repealed.

(d)

Repealed.

(e)

The Commissioner may promulgate rules to establish and amend all producer and license fees.

Oct. 9, 1940, 54 Stat. 1081, ch. 792, ch. II, § 41
Feb. 23, 1980, D.C. Law 3-52, § 6, 27 DCR 26
June 14, 1994, D.C. Law 10-128, § 403(a), 41 DCR 2096
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 61(a), 43 DCR 530
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(r)(2), 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 29(c), 45 DCR 745
Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-232, § 202(c), 54 DCR 368
Refund of fees when license refused, see § 47-1318.
1981 Ed., § 35-1545.
1973 Ed., § 35-1345.
D.C. Law 16-232 rewrote subsecs. (a) and (e), and repealed subsec. (b) to (d).
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2501.03.